Massachusetts, session 194th, S2471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 33 of the Massachusetts General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting after Section 139 the following new section:-
Section 140
a) As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the following
meanings unless the context clearly requires otherwise:
“Active-duty combat” is performing the following services in the active federal military
service of the United States: participation in an armed conflict; performance of a hazardous
service in a foreign state; or performance of a duty through an instrumentality of war.
“Official declaration of war” is an official declaration of war made by the United States
Congress pursuant to Article I, § 8, Clause 11 of the United States Constitution.
of 2

b) Notwithstanding any other provision of the General Laws, the Massachusetts National
Guard and any member thereof shall not be released from the state into active duty combat
unless the United States Congress has passed an official declaration of war or has taken an
official action pursuant to Article I, § 8, Clause 15 of the United States Constitution to explicitly
call forth the Massachusetts National Guard and any member thereof for the enumerated
purposes to expressly execute the laws of the union, repel an invasion or suppress an
insurrection. The Governor shall take all actions necessary to comply with the requirements of
this section.
SECTION 2. Section 1 shall become effective immediately upon passage.
of 2